Utah statutes.
7-2-22.   Termination of authority to transact business.

If an institution or other person subject to the jurisdiction of the department is operated by a federal deposit insurance agency or its appointee pursuant to a federal receivership or conservatorship for a period of 180 days or more, the authority of that institution or person to transact business under this title shall terminate upon the expiration of the 180-day period.



Enacted by Chapter 229, 1987 General Session

